test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-se_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - se: # pronouns 4 'eng /est see/fin' - full paradigm
     se+Pron+Sg+Nom: se
     se+Pron+Sg+Gen: sīe
     se+Pron+Sg+Par: siedā
     se+Pron+Sg+Dat: sīen
     se+Pron+Sg+Ins: sīekõks
     se+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sīʼezõ, sīezõ]
     se+Pron+Sg+Ela: sīestõ 
     se+Pron+Pl+Nom: ne
     se+Pron+Pl+Gen: nänt
     se+Pron+Pl+Par: nēḑi
     se+Pron+Pl+Dat: näntõn
     se+Pron+Pl+Ins: näntkõks
     se+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nēʼži, nēži]
     se+Pron+Pl+Ela: nēšti
